latvian.foma
read lexc latvian.lexc

define Lexicon;

define ConsonantGradation [s -> š || _ "*"]
    .o. [t -> š || _ "*"]
    .o. [z -> ž || _ "*"]
    .o. [d -> ž || _ "*"]
    .o. [c -> č || _ "*"]
    .o. [dz -> d ž || _ "*"]
    .o. [l -> ļ || _ "*"]
    .o. [n -> ņ || _ "*"]
    .o. [p -> p j || _ "*"]
    .o. [b -> b j || _ "*"]
    .o. [m -> m j || _ "*"]
    .o. [v -> v j || _ "*"];

define CleanupAsterisk %* -> 0;

define InsertII [..] -> ī || _ Ī J"^";

define CleanUpII Ī -> 0;

define InsertJ [..] -> "j" || _ J "^""^";

define CleanUpJ J -> 0;

define CleanUpCaret %⅝ -> 0;

define Grammar Lexicon
    .o. ConsonantGradation
    .o. CleanupAsterisk
    .o. InsertII
    .o. InsertJ
    .o. CleanUpII
    .o. CleanUpJ
    .o. CleanUpCaret;

regex Grammar;
